Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 7

Farm Mediation

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-7-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Farm Mediation Act”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 1.

2-7-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Action” means a court action or legal recourse to the courts of the State of Arkansas by a creditor against a farmer for payment of a debt, to enforce or foreclose a security interest, lien, or mortgage, or to repossess or declare a creditor's interest in agricultural property.

“Action” includes, but is not limited to, garnishment, replevin, foreclosure, execution of judgment, and involuntary receivership;

“Agricultural property” means all of the following:

Real property that is used principally for farming or ranching;

Real property that is a farmer's principal place of residence and any land contiguous to the residence;

Personal property that is used as security to finance farming or ranching; and

Personal property that is used for farming or ranching;

“Creditor” means any person who holds a mortgage on agricultural property, who has a lien on or a security interest in agricultural property, or who is a judgment creditor with a judgment against a farmer affecting the farmer's agricultural property;

“Farmer” means any person who is engaged in farming or ranching, who has at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in outstanding agricultural loans that are secured by real estate, crops, livestock, farm machinery, or other agricultural supplies, and who either:

Owns or leases a total of fifty (50) acres or more of land that is agricultural property; or

Has had gross sales of farm products of at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in any of the preceding three (3) years;

“Farming” or “ranching” means the employment or operation of real property for the production of agricultural products including, but not limited to, the following:

The production or cultivation of agricultural, horticultural, or aquacultural commodities such as field crops, rice, soybeans, cotton, sorghum, corn, wheat, fruit, vegetables, mushrooms, nursery stock, ornamental trees, sod, or flowers;

Animal or poultry husbandry and the production of poultry and poultry products, livestock, equine or fur-bearing animals and wildlife, including the raising, breeding, shearing, grazing, or other feeding of these animals;

Dairy production;

Viticulture, wine-making, and related activities; and

On-site storing, handling, and processing incidental to the production of the foregoing agricultural or horticultural products and commodities;

“Mediation” means the process in which a neutral person or persons intermediate between or among parties for the purpose of facilitating the settlement of their dispute by mutual agreement; and

“Party” or “parties” means, with respect to the mediation of a dispute affecting a farmer's agricultural property, the farmer, a creditor of the farmer, and any other person necessary to the resolution of a dispute or an action.

Trial court did not err in refusing to apply the Arkansas Farm Mediation Act, §2-7-101 et seq., to an action relating to a writ of execution where a debtor failed to show that this proceeding was in connection with a secured indebtedness. Moreover, he did not make it clear that the loans were secured by real estate, crops, livestock, farm machinery, or other agricultural supplies, as required in the definition of a “farmer.”Looney v. Raby, 100 Ark. App. 326, 268 S.W.3d 345 (2007).

Publisher's Notes. This section, which excluded from this chapter commercial banks chartered by the state or federal government, was repealed by Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 36, § 16. The section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 829, § 11.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 1060, § 20: Apr. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the efficient administration of the programs and functions conducted by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority is critical to the economic well-being of the state; that it is vital that business and citizens are immediately encouraged to the full extent possible to use the authority's programs and thereby help the economic development of state resources; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the authority's programs are operated efficiently and in a manner that does not hinder participation or negatively impact program applicants. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 2.

2-7-103. [Repealed.]

2-7-201. Creation.

There is hereby created within the Department of Agriculture the Arkansas Farm Mediation Office which shall administer the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program to provide mediation and debt management services to farmers and their creditors in the State of Arkansas.

The program shall be administered by the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture who shall employ mediators and administrative staff in such numbers as are necessary and as the General Assembly may appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may apply to the United States Secretary of Agriculture or any other agency or department for any financial assistance for the administration and operation of the program.

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee shall select mediators who are knowledgeable in the areas of finance, agriculture, and negotiation and shall train them in any other matters as are necessary to carry out their functions under this chapter.

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Division of Agriculture Development was transferred from the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority by Acts 1989, No. 885.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “president” for “director” throughout the section; deleted “Division of Agriculture Development of the” preceding “Arkansas Development Finance Authority” in (a); substituted “Arkansas Development Finance Authority” for “Division of Agriculture Development” in (b)(1); and substituted “The president may promulgate rules” for “The director shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations” in (b)(4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Development Finance Authority” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Agriculture” for “President of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority” and “president” throughout (b).

Mediation meetings between a farmer and any other parties conducted by a mediator are not open to public participation and are not subject to the provisions for open meetings under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 3; 2015, No. 1060, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 10.

2-7-202. Disclosure of information.

All materials, data, and information received by the Arkansas Farm Mediation Office are confidential and are not subject to examination or disclosure as public information under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

No mediator or administrative employee of the office shall knowingly disclose any materials, data, or information concerning a mediation request or suspension order without the consent of the farmer and the creditors involved.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 10.

2-7-203. Forms.

The Arkansas Farm Mediation Office shall prepare all forms necessary for the administration of this chapter and shall ensure that forms are disseminated and that the availability of mediation under this chapter is publicized so that creditors and borrowers of agricultural loans receive adequate notification of the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Mediation

2-7-301. Voluntary mediation.

A farmer and any creditor of the farmer may voluntarily participate in mediation under the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program if they wish to resolve a dispute between them that involves the creditor's interest in a mortgage, lien, security interest, or judgment affecting the agricultural property of the farmer.

Voluntary mediation shall occur before an action has been initiated in court in which the farmer and creditor are parties.

The Arkansas Farm Mediation Office shall adopt voluntary mediation application and request forms.

Trial court did not err in refusing to apply the Arkansas Farm Mediation Act, §2-7-101 et seq., to an action relating to a writ of execution where a debtor failed to show that this proceeding was in connection with a secured indebtedness. Moreover, he did not make it clear that the loans were secured by real estate, crops, livestock, farm machinery, or other agricultural supplies, as required in the definition of a “farmer.”Looney v. Raby, 100 Ark. App. 326, 268 S.W.3d 345 (2007).

Cited: First Nat'l Bank v. Clinton, 304 Ark. 411, 802 S.W.2d 928 (1991).

The notice shall be in a form and contain the information as required by rule.

The Director of the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program shall make forms available in each county recorder's office.

A description of the debt and the amount currently owed;

A description of the agricultural property securing the debt;

A description of the proceeding the creditor intends to commence or continue or the action the creditor intends to take;

A statement that the farmer has the right to request mandatory mediation which could result in restructuring the debt;

The address and telephone number of the director;

A statement that a request for mandatory mediation must be served on the director within fourteen (14) days after service of the notice on the farmer; and

The location of the office of the recorder of the county in which the farmer resides where an application form for requesting mandatory mediation may be obtained.

A creditor shall also serve a copy of such mediation notice on the director within five (5) days after the mediation notice has been served on the farmer by the creditor.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 5.

2-7-302. Release before proceedings required — Exceptions.

In connection with a secured indebtedness of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more, no proceeding against a farmer shall be commenced to foreclose a mortgage on agricultural property, to terminate a contract for deed to purchase agricultural property, to repossess or foreclose a security interest in agricultural property, to set off or seize an account, moneys, or other asset which is agricultural property, or to enforce any judgment against agricultural property unless the creditor has first obtained a release as provided in this chapter.

An action for attachment or replevin may be commenced without first obtaining a release in those cases provided for under §16-110-101(1)(A)(vi)-(viii) or §18-60-807.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 4.

2-7-303. Notice — Form and content.

Before commencing any proceeding prohibited by this section, §2-7-302, and §§2-7-304 —2-7-306 without first obtaining a release, a creditor shall serve a notice on the farmer that the farmer may request mandatory mediation of the farm indebtedness.

The notice shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:

The name and address of the farmer;

The name, address, and telephone number of the creditor;

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 4.

2-7-304. Requests for mediation.

All requests for mediation by a farmer under §2-7-301 shall be served on the Director of the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program within fourteen (14) days after the mediation notice was served on the farmer by the creditor. Every request for mediation shall be in a form and contain the information required by the director.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 4.

2-7-305. Information on services — Assignment of mediator.

Within five (5) days after receiving a request for mediation, the Director of the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program shall inform the farmer and the creditor of any financial analysis or legal or other services available that may assist them in preparing for the mediation meeting and of any other requirements the farmer and creditor must meet before the mediation meeting.

Within twenty-one (21) days after receiving a request for mediation, the director shall assign a mediator and serve notice on the farmer and all his or her known creditors of the name of the mediator, the time and place of the mediation meeting.

The meeting shall be not more than forty-two (42) days after the director receives the request, and of any activities prohibited during mediation.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 4.

2-7-306. When provisions not applicable.

Sections 2-7-302 — 2-7-305 shall not apply:

Where the debt to be collected was listed as a scheduled debt by the farmer in a petition in bankruptcy or for which a proof of claim form has been filed by a creditor under United States Code, Title 11, Chapters 7, 11, 12, or 13; and

The debt was discharged;

The creditor was granted relief from the automatic stay;

Provision for repayment, restructuring, or other treatment of the debt was made in a confirmed plan;

In the year preceding the date of commencement of the collection action, the automatic stay provided for under 11 U.S.C. § 362 was in effect with regard to the debt for more than ninety (90) days; or

When the Arkansas Farm Mediation Office has not adopted and promulgated bylaws, rules, or program guidelines necessary to implement this chapter or has not hired qualified mediators for the mediation region in which the agricultural property involved is located.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 4.

2-7-307. Initial meeting — Subsequent meetings.

The initial mediation meeting shall be attended by the farmer and the creditor who served the mediation notice. The meeting shall be at least one (1) hour long and may be continued for a longer period at the discretion of the parties involved. Other creditors of the farmer are strongly encouraged to attend and may attend all mediation meetings.

After the initial meeting any further mediation meetings shall be held by consent of the parties.

Listen to the farmer and the creditors desiring to be heard;

Attempt to mediate between the farmer and the creditors to reach a consensus where possible;

Advise the farmer and creditor as to the existence of available assistance programs;

Encourage the parties to adjust, refinance, or provide for the payment of the farmer's debts; and

Advise, counsel, and assist the farmer and creditors in attempting to arrive at an agreement for the future conduct of financial relations among the parties or to arrive at a settlement which may be stipulated to in court for the resolution to the court action.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 6.

2-7-308. Right to attorney — Duties of mediator.

(1)A farmer or other party has the right to be represented by an attorney at any mediation meeting or hearing.

A waiver of this right before any mediation meeting or hearing is ineffective.

At the initial mediation meeting and subsequent meetings, the mediator shall:

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, §§ 7, 9.

2-7-309. Agreements.

If an agreement is reached between the farmer and any creditor or creditors, the agreement shall:

Be signed by the farmer and any such creditor or creditors;

Bind each to the terms of the agreement;

Be enforced as a legal contract between the farmer and such creditor or creditors; and

Constitute a mediation release.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 8.

2-7-310. Release of creditor — Effective period.

The Director of the Arkansas Farm Mediation Program shall issue a release upon request to any creditor who has paid any required fees and:

Who has attended an initial mediation meeting under § 2-7-301 or § 2-7-307;

Who has served a mediation notice on the farmer and the farmer has not requested mediation within the time allowed;

When the farmer has waived mediation with respect to that creditor or the agricultural property at issue;

When the agricultural property has been abandoned by the farmer;

In the discretion of the director if the default is other than monetary;

When ordered to do so by a court upon a finding by the court that mediation would be unduly burdensome and an extreme hardship on the creditor;

Upon the failure of a farmer to appear at a scheduled mediation meeting; or

As otherwise provided by rule.

A release is effective as to any proceeding commenced or continued or any action taken one (1) year or less after its date of issuance, but a release is not effective as to any proceeding commenced or action taken more than one (1) year after its date of issuance.

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 716, § 1. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

2-8-101. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 1; 1999, No. 1367, § 1.

2-8-102. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 2; 1999, No. 1367, § 2; 2001, No. 900, § 1.

2-8-103. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 3; 2001, No. 900, § 2.

2-8-104. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 4.

2-8-105. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 5.

2-8-106. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 6; 1999, No. 1367, § 4; 2001, No. 900, § 3.

2-8-107. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 7.

2-8-108. Acts 1997, No. 1117, § 8; 1999, No. 1367, § 5.

2-8-109. Acts 1999, No. 1367, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 829, § 8.

Subchapter 2

— Farm Mediation Office